New York, session 2025-2026, A3824.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3207-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3207-b. School attendance for agricultural learning events. 1. A 4 school district may permit an enrolled student, with the consent of such 5 student's parent, guardian, or other person in parental relation, to 6 attend an agricultural learning event. For the purposes of attendance, 7 any student so serving while school is in session shall be recorded as 8 in attendance. 9 2. For purposes of this section, an "agricultural learning event" 10 shall include, but not be limited to, scheduled event of state future 11 farmers of America (FFA) associations, the national future farmers of 12 America (FFA) organization, and 4-H programs as part of organized compe- 13 titions or exhibitions. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08323-01-5